Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3968
Grade A milk producer permit; manufacturing grade milk producer permit; label restrictions.

(1) A milk producer shall receive a Grade A milk producer permit if the milk produced is in conformance with all requirements of the Nebraska Milk Act for Grade A milk or milk products.

(2) A milk producer shall receive a manufacturing grade milk producer permit if the milk produced is in conformance with all requirements of the Nebraska Milk Act for manufacturing grade milk or dairy products.

(3) Dairy products made from milk for manufacturing purposes shall not be labeled with the Grade A designation.

Laws 2007, LB111, § 4.